Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB496.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5912. Voter registration.(a) Completion of form.--Prior to release or discharge, an inmate shall complete:(1) a voter registration application; or(2) a form developed by the department, in consultation with the Department of State, stating that the inmate declines to complete a voter registration application at that time.(b) Rules and regulations.--The department may prescribe, adopt, promulgate and enforce rules and regulations to administer the provisions of this section.123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0496PN0485 - 2 - 1